sv: Media > Utskrivbart material: Aktivitetsblad; Planerare; Väggkonst
ja: メディア > プリンタブル: アクティビティシート; プランナー; ウォールアート
cs: Média > Materiály k tisku: Pracovní listy; Plánovače; Grafika na zeď
it: Media > File stampabili: Schede di attività; Planner; Decorazioni da parete
th: สื่อ > ไฟล์สำหรับพิมพ์: ใบงานกิจกรรม; แพลนเนอร์; ภาพตกแต่งผนัง
da: Medier > Print selv-filer: Aktivitetsark; Planlægningskalendere; Vægkunst
hu: Média > Nyomtatható anyagok: Foglalkoztató lapok; Tervezők; Fali képek
ru: Медиаконтент > Материалы для печати: Листы с заданиями; Планеры; Настенные постеры
pt-PT: Multimédia > Imprimíveis: Fichas de atividades; Planeadores; Arte de parede
ko: 미디어 > 인쇄용 파일: 활동지; 플래너; 월 아트
lt-LT: Medija > Spausdinami failai: Užduočių lapai; Planuokliai; Sienų menas
pl: Media > Materiały do druku: Karty pracy; Planery; Grafiki ścienne
zh-CN: 媒体 > 可打印文件: 活动表; 计划表; 墙面装饰画
vi: Truyền thông > Tệp có thể in: Phiếu hoạt động; Sổ kế hoạch; Tranh treo tường
es: Multimedia > Imprimibles: Hojas de actividades; Planificadores; Arte para pared
nl: Media > Printables: Activiteitenbladen; Planners; Wanddecoratie
en: Media > Printables: Activity Sheets; Planners; Wall Art
nb: Medier > Utskriftsklare filer: Aktivitetsark; Planleggere; Veggkunst
de: Medien > Druckvorlagen: Aktivitätsblätter; Planer; Wandkunst
ro-RO: Media > Materiale imprimabile: Fișe de activități; Planificatoare; Artă de perete
sl-SI: Mediji > Gradiva za tiskanje: Delovni listi; Planerji; Stenske grafike
fr: Médias > Fichiers à imprimer: Fiches d’activités; Planificateurs; Décoration murale
tr: Medya > Yazdırılabilir ürünler: Etkinlik sayfaları; Planlayıcılar; Duvar sanatı
pt-BR: Mídia > Arquivos para impressão: Folhas de atividades; Planners; Arte de parede
hr-HR: Mediji > Materijali za ispis: Radni listovi; Planeri; Zidne grafike
zh-TW: 媒體 > 可列印檔案: 學習單; 計畫本; 牆面藝術
fi: Media > Tulostettavat tuotteet: Tehtäväsivut; Suunnittelukalenterit; Seinätaide
sk-SK: Médiá > Materiály na tlač: Pracovné listy; Plánovače; Nástenné umenie
el: Μέσα ενημέρωσης > Εκτυπώσιμα: Φύλλα δραστηριοτήτων; Ατζέντες; Έργα τέχνης τοίχου
bg-BG: Медия > Материали за печат: Работни листове; Планери; Стенно изкуство